ndIspell/$dictionaries/italian.aff
#
#
#	Affix table for Italian
#
# This table is a first cut at a description of the common affixes found
# in the Italian language.  It is definitely not final.  This is the
# equivalent of a pre-alpha version.  The dictionary is not complete
# either.
#
# Use at your own risk.  In principle, not many wrong spellings will be
# accepted, but since it is so preliminary, ispell will complain about
# many, many words. We state here the rule: the resulting word follows
# the accenting rules. 
#
# This is V1.0 of the release. It is released under the GNU General
# Public License. Copies of that license are available from Free
# Software Foundation, Inc., 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA.
# To use both upper- and lower-case affix flags, you must

# #define MASKBITS 64
# in your local.h file. 

# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ 
# Used:      **  **  *        ** **     
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ 
# Available:   --  -- --------  -  ----                           
#

texchars ()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

compoundmin 8

compoundwords on
 
allaffixes off

# Character-set definitions.  The special-character strings are appropriate
# for use with the "-mm" nroff/troff macro package.  Users of other formatters
# or macro packages will undoubtedly have to modify these definitions.
#
defstringtype "list" "nroff" ".list"


wordchars	a       A
stringchar      à       À
stringchar      á       Á
wordchars	[b-e]	[B-E]
stringchar      é       É
stringchar      è       È
wordchars	[f-i]	[F-I]
stringchar      í       Í
stringchar      ì       Ì
wordchars	[j-n]	[J-N]
wordchars	o       O
stringchar      ó       Ó
stringchar      ò       Ò
wordchars	[p-u]	[P-U]
stringchar      ù       Ù
stringchar      ú       Ú
wordchars	[v-z]	[V-Z]

boundarychars   [.]             # electronic adresses ("." is a regexp!)
boundarychars   [---]           # vedere il significato in quello francese

#
# TeX/LaTeX `a la italian.sty (It is the same as the default)
#

altstringtype "tex" "TeX" ".tex" ".ltx" ".bib"

altstringchar   "\\'a"    á
altstringchar   "\\'A"    Á
altstringchar   "\\`a"    à
altstringchar   "\\`A"    À
altstringchar   "\\'e"    é
altstringchar   "\\'E"    "É"
altstringchar   "\\`e"    è
altstringchar   "\\`E"    È
altstringchar   "\\'\\i"        í
altstringchar   "\\'I"    Í
altstringchar   "\\`\\i"        ì
altstringchar   "\\`I"    Ì
altstringchar   "\\'o"    ó
altstringchar   "\\'O"    Ó
altstringchar   "\\`o"    ò
altstringchar   "\\`O"    Ò
altstringchar   "\\'u"    ú
altstringchar   "\\'U"    Ú
altstringchar   "\\`u"    ù
altstringchar   "\\`U"    Ù


prefixes

flag *R:
	.	>	ri      # vedere -> rivedere
                                # vendere -> rivendere
                                # usare -> riusare
                                # dire -> ridire
                                # partire -> ripartire

flag *B:
        .       >       pre     # vedere -> prevedere
                                # venire -> prevenire
                                # scrivere -> prescivere
                                # dire -> predire

suffixes

flag *S:
        r       >       ESSA
        e       >       SSA

flag *A:        # I Coniugazione
        # present
        a r e   >       -are,o
        a r e   >       -are,i
        a r e   >       -are,a
        a r e   >       -are,iamo
        a r e   >       -are,ate
        a r e   >       -are,ano

        # imperfetto
        a r e   >       -are,avo
        a r e   >       -are,avi
        a r e   >       -are,ava
        a r e   >       -are,avamo
        a r e   >       -are,avate
        a r e   >       -are,avano

        # passato remoto
        a r e   >       -are,ai
        a r e   >       -are,asti
        a r e   >       -are,ò
        a r e   >       -are,ammo
        a r e   >       -are,aste
        a r e   >       -are,arono

        # futuro semplice
        a r e   >       -are,erò
        a r e   >       -are,erai
        a r e   >       -are,erà
        a r e   >       -are,eremo
        a r e   >       -are,erete
        a r e   >       -are,eranno

        # participio
        a r e   >       -are,ante
        a r e   >       -are,ato
        
        # gerundio
        a r e   >       -are,ando

        # Congiuntivo presente
        a r e   >       -are,i
        a r e   >       -are,iamo
        a r e   >       -are,iate
        a r e   >       -are,ino

        # Congiuntivo imperfetto
        a r e   >       -are,assi
        a r e   >       -are,asse
        a r e   >       -are,assimo
        a r e   >       -are,aste
        a r e   >       -are,assero

        # Condizionale
        a r e   >       -are,erei
        a r e   >       -are,eresti
        a r e   >       -are,erebbe
        a r e   >       -are,eremmo
        a r e   >       -are,ereste
        a r e   >       -are,erebbero    

flag *E:        # II Coniugazione
        # present
        e r e   >       -ere,o
        e r e   >       -ere,i
        e r e   >       -ere,e
        e r e   >       -ere,iamo
        e r e   >       -ere,ete
        e r e   >       -ere,ono

        # imperfetto
        e r e   >       -ere,evo
        e r e   >       -ere,evi
        e r e   >       -ere,eva
        e r e   >       -ere,evamo
        e r e   >       -ere,evate
        e r e   >       -ere,evano

        # passato remoto
        e r e   >       -ere,etti  # temette
        e r e   >       -ere,ei   
        e r e   >       -ere,esti
        e r e   >       -ere,é     # teme'
        e r e   >       -ere,ette
        e r e   >       -ere,emmo
        e r e   >       -ere,este
        e r e   >       -ere,ettero
        e r e   >       -ere,erono # temerono

        # futuro semplice
        e r e   >       -ere,erò
        e r e   >       -ere,erai
        e r e   >       -ere,erà
        e r e   >       -ere,eremo
        e r e   >       -ere,erete
        e r e   >       -ere,eranno

        # participio
        e r e   >       -ere,ente
        e r e   >       -ere,uto
        
        # gerundio
        e r e   >       -ere,endo

        # Congiuntivo presente
        e r e   >       -ere,a
        e r e   >       -ere,i
        e r e   >       -ere,iamo
        e r e   >       -ere,iate
        e r e   >       -ere,ano

        # Congiuntivo imperfetto
        e r e   >       -ere,essi
        e r e   >       -ere,esse
        e r e   >       -ere,essimo
        e r e   >       -ere,este
        e r e   >       -ere,essero

        # Condizionale
        e r e   >       -ere,erei
        e r e   >       -ere,eresti
        e r e   >       -ere,erebbe
        e r e   >       -ere,eremmo
        e r e   >       -ere,ereste
        e r e   >       -ere,erebbero    

flag *I:        # III Coniugazione
        # present
        i r e   >       -ire,o
        i r e   >       -ire,i
        i r e   >       -ire,e
        i r e   >       -ire,iamo
        i r e   >       -ire,ite
        i r e   >       -ire,ono

        # imperfetto
        i r e   >       -ire,ivo
        i r e   >       -ire,ivi
        i r e   >       -ire,iva
        i r e   >       -ire,ivamo
        i r e   >       -ire,ivate
        i r e   >       -ire,ivano

        # passato remoto
        i r e   >       -ire,ii  
        i r e   >       -ire,isti
        i r e   >       -ire,ì
        i r e   >       -ire,immo
        i r e   >       -ire,iste
        i r e   >       -ire,irono 

        # futuro semplice
        i r e   >       -ire,irò
        i r e   >       -ire,irai
        i r e   >       -ire,irà
        i r e   >       -ire,iremo
        i r e   >       -ire,irete
        i r e   >       -ire,iranno

        # participio
        i r e   >       -ire,ente
        i r e   >       -ire,ito
        
        # gerundio
        i r e   >       -ire,endo

        # Congiuntivo presente
        i r e   >       -ire,a
        i r e   >       -ire,iamo
        i r e   >       -ire,iate
        i r e   >       -ire,ano

        # Congiuntivo imperfetto
        i r e   >       -ire,issi
        i r e   >       -ire,isse
        i r e   >       -ire,issimo
        i r e   >       -ire,iste
        i r e   >       -ire,issero

        # Condizionale
        i r e   >       -ire,irei
        i r e   >       -ire,iresti
        i r e   >       -ire,irebbe
        i r e   >       -ire,iremmo
        i r e   >       -ire,ireste
        i r e   >       -ire,irebbero    

flag *U:        # III Coniugazione (Variazione) es. obbedire --> obedisco
        # present
        i r e   >       -ire,isco
        i r e   >       -ire,isci
        i r e   >       -ire,isce
        i r e   >       -ire,iamo
        i r e   >       -ire,ite
        i r e   >       -ire,iscono

        # imperfetto
        i r e   >       -ire,ivo
        i r e   >       -ire,ivi
        i r e   >       -ire,iva
        i r e   >       -ire,ivamo
        i r e   >       -ire,ivate
        i r e   >       -ire,ivano

        # passato remoto
        i r e   >       -ire,ii  
        i r e   >       -ire,isti
        i r e   >       -ire,ì
        i r e   >       -ire,immo
        i r e   >       -ire,iste
        i r e   >       -ire,irono 

        # futuro semplice
        i r e   >       -ire,irò
        i r e   >       -ire,irai
        i r e   >       -ire,irà
        i r e   >       -ire,iremo
        i r e   >       -ire,irete
        i r e   >       -ire,iranno

        # participio
        i r e   >       -ire,ente
        i r e   >       -ire,ito
        
        # gerundio
        i r e   >       -ire,endo

        # Congiuntivo presente
        i r e   >       -ire,isca
        i r e   >       -ire,iamo
        i r e   >       -ire,iate
        i r e   >       -ire,iscano

        # Congiuntivo imperfetto
        i r e   >       -ire,issi
        i r e   >       -ire,isse
        i r e   >       -ire,issimo
        i r e   >       -ire,iste
        i r e   >       -ire,issero

        # Condizionale
        i r e   >       -ire,irei
        i r e   >       -ire,iresti
        i r e   >       -ire,irebbe
        i r e   >       -ire,iremmo
        i r e   >       -ire,ireste
        i r e   >       -ire,irebbero    

# Riflessivo
flag *F:
        # infinito presente
        r e     >       -e,si   # lavare -> lavarsi
        r e     >       -e,mi   # lavare -> lavarmi
        r e     >       -e,ti   # lavare -> lavarti
        r e     >       -e,ci   # lavare -> lavarci
        # participio presente
        r e     >       -re,ntesi   # lavare -> lavantesi
        r e     >       -re,ntisi   # lavare -> lavantisi
        # participio passato
        r e     >       -re,tosi   # lavare -> lavatosi
        r e     >       -re,tomi   # lavare -> lavatomi
        r e     >       -re,toti   # lavare -> lavatoti
        r e     >       -re,tici   # lavare -> lavatici
        r e     >       -re,tivi   # lavare -> lavativi
        r e     >       -re,tisi   # lavare -> lavatisi
        # gerundio presente
        r e     >       -re,ndosi       # lavare -> lavandosi
        r e     >       -re,ndomi       # lavare -> lavandomi
        r e     >       -re,ndoti       # lavare -> lavandoti
        r e     >       -re,ndoci       # lavare -> lavandoci
        r e     >       -re,ndovi       # lavare -> lavandovi

# Avverbibi derivati +mente
# La forma grammaticale da cui nasce e' l'aggettivo, cui si aggiunge
# il suffisso +mente
flag *V:
        o       >       -o,amente       # pazzo -> pazzamente
        a       >       mente        # pazza -> pazzamente
# se le ultime due lettere sono delle "re" o "le" si ha l'apocope
# della vocale finale: amorevole -> amorevolmente
        r e     >       -e,mente
        l e     >       -e,mente
# else aggiunge mente o aggiunge +issimamente
        e       >       mente
        e       >       -e,issimamente
